Wyoming, session 2026, HB0087.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
[2026-2027 WATER PROGRAM]
[AUTHORIZED LEVEL I AND LEVEL II STUDIES]
Section 1. LEVEL I RECONNAISSANCE STUDIES – NEW
DEVELOPMENT. The following sums of money are appropriated
from water development account I, as created by W.S.
41-2-124(a)(i), to the water development commission to be
expended to conduct the following reconnaissance studies as
defined in W.S. 41-2-114. Funds appropriated under this
section for a particular project that are in excess of the
actual amount necessary to complete the study may, subject
to the review and recommendation of the select water
committee, be expended by the commission to complete the
reconnaissance study for any other project listed in this
section. Appropriated funds not expended or obligated prior
to July 1, 2029 shall revert to water development account
I. The commission shall submit a report to the legislature
on each of the following studies prior to the 2028
legislative session:
[LEVEL I RECONNAISSANCE STUDIES - NEW DEVELOPMENT]
PROJECT LOCATION APPROPRIATION
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0087
ENROLLED ACT NO. 20, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Grover Water Master Plan Lincoln County $165,000
Kemmerer-Diamondville
Water Master Plan Lincoln County $292,000
Laramie Water Master Plan Albany County $276,000
Medicine Bow Water Master Plan Carbon County $174,000
Pine Bluffs Water Master Plan Laramie County $169,000
Superior Water Master Plan Sweetwater County $259,000
UW Water Research Program Statewide $374,997
Worland Water Master Plan Washakie County $263,000
Yoder Water Master Plan Goshen County $214,000
Total appropriation for Section 1 $2,186,997
Section 2. LEVEL II FEASIBILITY STUDIES – NEW
DEVELOPMENT. The following sums of money are appropriated
from water development account I, as created by W.S.
41-2-124(a)(i), to the water development commission to be
expended to conduct the following feasibility studies as
defined in W.S. 41-2-114. Funds appropriated under this
section for a particular project that are in excess of the
actual amount necessary to complete the study may, subject
to the review and recommendation of the select water
committee, be expended by the commission to complete the
feasibility study for any other project listed in this
section. Appropriated funds not expended or obligated prior
to July 1, 2029 shall revert to water development account
I. The commission shall submit a report to the legislature
on each of the following studies prior to the 2028
legislative session:
[LEVEL II FEASIBILITY STUDIES - NEW DEVELOPMENT]
PROJECT LOCATION APPROPRIATION
Bedford and Turnerville
Regional Supply Lincoln County $327,000
Total appropriation for Section 2 $327,000
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0087
ENROLLED ACT NO. 20, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3. LEVEL I RECONNAISSANCE STUDIES –
REHABILITATION. The following sums of money are
appropriated from water development account II, as created
by W.S. 41-2-124(a)(ii), to the water development
commission to be expended to conduct the following
reconnaissance studies as defined in W.S. 41-2-114. Funds
appropriated under this section for a particular project
that are in excess of the actual amount necessary to
complete the study may, subject to the review and
recommendation of the select water committee, be expended
by the commission to complete the reconnaissance study for
any other project listed in this section. Appropriated
funds not expended or obligated prior to July 1, 2029 shall
revert to water development account II. The commission
shall submit a report to the legislature on each of the
following studies prior to the 2028 legislative session:
[LEVEL I RECONNAISSANCE STUDIES - REHABILITATION]
PROJECT LOCATION APPROPRIATION
Shoshone Irrigation District
Master Plan Park County $470,000
Total appropriation for Section 3 $470,000
Section 4. LEVEL II FEASIBILITY STUDIES –
REHABILITATION. The following sums of money are
appropriated from water development account II, as created
by W.S. 41-2-124(a)(ii), to the water development
commission to be expended to conduct the following
feasibility studies as defined in W.S. 41-2-114. Funds
appropriated under this section for a particular project
that are in excess of the actual amount necessary to
complete the study may, subject to the review and
recommendation of the select water committee, be expended
by the commission to complete the feasibility study for any
other project listed in this section. Appropriated funds
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0087
ENROLLED ACT NO. 20, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
not expended or obligated prior to July 1, 2029 shall
revert to water development account II. The commission
shall submit a report to the legislature on each of the
following studies prior to the 2028 legislative session:
[LEVEL II FEASIBILITY STUDIES - REHABILITATION]
PROJECT LOCATION APPROPRIATION
Casper Alcova Irrigation District
Lateral Rehabilitation Natrona County $308,000
Wheatland Source and Transmission
Evaluation Platte County $220,000
Total appropriation for Section 4 $528,000
Section 5. There is appropriated one hundred seventy
five thousand dollars ($175,000.00) to the water
development commission from water development account I, as
created by W.S. 41-2-124(a)(i), to fund the office of water
programs established under W.S. 41-2-125 for the period
beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2028.
Section 6. 2021 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 11,
Section 5, as amended by 2023 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter
186, Section 7 is amended to read:
Section 5. LEVEL II FEASIBILITY STUDIES –
DAMS AND RESERVOIRS. In the 2015 Omnibus water
bill – planning, 2015 Wyoming Session Laws,
Chapter 168, Section 5, the following sums of
money are appropriated from water development
account III, as created by W.S. 41-2-124(a)(iii),
to the water development commission to be
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0087
ENROLLED ACT NO. 20, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
expended to conduct the following feasibility
studies as defined in W.S. 41-2-114. A three (3)
year time extension is granted for the Shell
Valley Storage – Leavitt Reservoir project and
appropriated funds for that project not obligated
prior to July 1, 2021 shall revert to water
development account III. A six (6) year time
extension is granted for the Clear Creek Storage
project and funds appropriated for the project
but not obligated prior to July 1, 2024 shall
revert to water development account III. A seven
(7) nine (9) year time extension is granted for
the Nowood River Storage – Alkali Cr. project and
funds appropriated for the project but not
obligated prior to July 1, 2025 July 1, 2027
shall revert to water development account III.
The commission shall submit a report to the
legislature prior to the 2020 legislative
session: on the Shell Valley Storage – Leavitt
Reservoir project study; prior to the 2023
legislative session on the Clear Creek Storage
study; and prior to the 2024 2026 legislative
session on the Nowood River Storage – Alkali Cr.
study.
[LEVEL II FEASIBILITY STUDIES – DAMS AND RESERVOIRS]
PROJECT LOCATION APPROPRIATION
Clear Creek Storage Johnson County $700,000
Nowood River Storage - Big Horn,
Alkali Cr. Washakie Counties $4,420,000 $5,995,000
Shell Valley Storage - Big Horn County
Leavitt Reservoir $4,500,000
Total 2015 appropriation for Section 5 $9,200,000
Total 2018 appropriation for Section 5 $0
Total 2021 appropriation for Section 5 $0
Total 2023 appropriation for Section 5 $420,000
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0087
ENROLLED ACT NO. 20, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Total 2026 appropriation for Section 5 $1,575,000
Section 7. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
6